Utah statutes.
49-16-601.5.   Line-of-duty disability benefit -- Benefits -- Monthly allowance.

(1)  An active member of this system who is unable to perform firefighter service due to a physical or mental condition incurred in the line-of-duty may apply to the office for a disability retirement benefit under this section.

(2)  If the condition is classified by the office as a line-of-duty disability, the member shall be granted a disability retirement benefit subject to Section 49-16-602.

(3)  The monthly disability retirement benefit is 50% of the member's final average salary.

